Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 7. International and Interstate Banks and Out-of-State Bank Holding Companies and Depository Institutions; Relationship with In-State Depository Institutions.

Sec. 06.05.548.
Concentration of deposits.

Unless expressly otherwise allowed under this title, an acquisition, a merger, or an ownership transaction is not permitted between a depository institution in this state and a depository institution in another state, if upon consummation of the acquisition, merger, or transaction the resulting depository institution, whether organized under state or federal law, controls 50 or more percent of the total amount of the deposits held by all depository institutions in this state.

The department may by regulation adopt a procedure that allows the department to waive the restriction in (a) of this section if the department finds that the purposes of this title will be fulfilled and the acquisition, merger, or transaction is in the public interest.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

06.05.532

. Renumbered in 2000.

Sec. 06.05.550.
Authority of international bank, interstate state bank, or interstate national bank to branch.

An international bank, an interstate state bank, or an interstate national bank whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation may acquire a branch bank as the result of a merger or consolidation of the international bank, interstate state bank, or interstate national bank with, or the purchase of all or substantially all of the assets of, a state bank, a national bank with its principal office in this state, or a branch of the state bank or national bank, unless the state bank or national bank is a recently formed bank.

An international bank may establish a new branch bank in this state or acquire a recently formed bank if the department approves the establishment or acquisition before the establishment or acquisition occurs. An interstate state bank or interstate national bank may not establish a branch bank in this state unless the establishment occurs through an acquisition under (a) of this section of a bank located in the state. An interstate state bank or interstate national bank may not establish a new branch bank in this state.

An interstate state bank, interstate national bank, or international bank that opens, occupies, or maintains a branch bank in the state has the same powers under the laws of the state as a state or national bank of the same type.

History.

(§ 87 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 28 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.05.555.
Certificate of authority for interstate state bank and international bank branching.

Before acquiring a branch bank under AS

06.05.550(a)

or establishing a branch bank under AS

06.05.550(b)

, an interstate state bank or international bank shall file an application with the department for and receive a certificate of authority to operate a branch bank. The application must include

all information and fees required under AS

06.05.399

;

the name of the bank and the address of its principal office;

if an international bank, the country under whose laws it is organized;

the amount of the bank’s capital actually paid in cash and the amount subscribed for and unpaid;

a complete and detailed statement of the bank’s financial condition;

the names of all other states and countries in which the bank is admitted or qualified to do business;

a copy of the bank’s charter, articles of incorporation, and bylaws, as applicable;

if an international bank, evidence satisfactory to the department that the bank is authorized to conduct a banking business under the laws of the country of its organization, and the nature of the bank’s business;

a properly executed designation of the department as the bank’s agent for service of process in an action or proceeding arising out of a transaction involving the branch bank; the designation must include the name and address of the officer, agent, or other person to whom the department is to forward the process; and

other information necessary or appropriate for the department to determine whether the bank is entitled to a certificate of authority from the department.

The department shall notify the interstate state bank or international bank of its action on the application. If the application and the accompanying documents do not comply with the requirements of (a) of this section, the department shall return them with an explanation of the noncompliance. If the department does not respond within 30 days of its receipt of the application, the application is considered to be accepted.

The interstate state bank or international bank shall publish notice of the application in the manner provided in AS

06.05.344(d)

— (e). The notice must state the proposed location of the branch bank.

Upon acceptance of the application, the department shall conduct an investigation to determine that

if an interstate state bank,

the laws of the home state of the bank authorize a state bank of this state to acquire a branch bank in the home state without conditions or restrictions on the operations of the branch bank; and

the bank supervisor of the home state of the bank has agreed to provide to the department the examination reports that the department determines sufficient to permit the department to determine on a current basis the financial condition of the bank;

the proposal is consistent with a sound and competitive banking system;

the capital structure of the bank is adequate in relation to the anticipated business and costs of operating the branch bank;

the name of the bank is not deceptively similar to the name of another branch bank or state bank and is not otherwise misleading; and

the other requirements of this chapter have been met.

Not later than 150 days after the department accepts an application by an interstate state bank or international bank for a certificate of authority to operate a branch bank, the department shall make a determination whether to approve the application. Within 30 days after the second publication of the notice referred to in (c) of this section, a person opposing the pending application may file written objections with the department. When it approves or denies the application, the department shall notify the bank and any other person who requested in writing to be notified, and, if the application is denied, the department shall state the reasons for its decision.

The department shall issue a certificate of authority to an interstate state bank or international bank to operate a branch bank if

the conditions imposed by the department in granting the certificate have been fulfilled; and

the requirements of this chapter are satisfied.

If the rights conferred by a certificate of authority issued under this section are not exercised within one year from the date of the issuance of the certificate under this section, the certificate lapses.

History.

(§ 87 ch 26 SLA 1993; am §§ 29 — 34 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For organization and corporate functions of banks, see 3 AAC 2, art. 3.

For liquidation, dissolution, and reorganization, see 3 AAC 2, art. 4.

Sec. 06.05.557.
Notice filing for interstate national banks.

An interstate national bank acquiring a branch in this state under AS

06.05.550

shall file a notice of the acquisition with the department along with a copy of the application filed with the agency that primarily regulates the interstate national bank. The notice and copy of the application shall be filed with the department at the same time the application is filed with the agency that primarily regulates the interstate national bank.

History.

(§ 35 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.05.560.
Asset requirements for international banks.

An international bank that operates one or more branch banks in the state shall maintain in the state assets in an amount acceptable to the department, except that the amount may not be less than the amount of deposits payable at or through the branch banks.

The department shall determine the value of the assets maintained by the international bank for purposes of this section. In making its determination, the department may include as assets currency, bonds, notes, debentures, drafts, bills of exchange, and other evidences of indebtedness owed by persons in the United States and collectible in the United States in United States currency or, with the approval of the department, in currency freely convertible into United States currency, but the department may not include as assets prepaid expenses, customers’ liability on prepaid expenses, or amounts due from other offices, branches, or wholly owned subsidiaries of the international bank.

When the department takes possession of a branch bank of an international bank under AS

06.05.468

and

06.05.470

, the assets of the international bank in the state shall be turned over to the department and disbursed as provided in AS

06.05.470

—

06.05.473

.

History.

(§ 87 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.565.
Applicability of title to interstate state banks, interstate national banks, international banks, and bank holding companies.

An interstate state bank or international bank operating a branch bank in the state is subject to the provisions of this title and the regulations adopted and orders issued under this title, except for the residency requirements in AS

06.05.435(a)

.

In meeting the reserve requirements of AS

06.05.200

(a) and applicable regulations, the bank shall maintain the required reserve fund in the state, except that assets held to meet the requirements of AS

06.05.560(a)

may be applied to meet the requirements of AS

06.05.200

.

A branch bank of an interstate state bank or international bank operating in the state is subject to examination under AS

06.01.015

and assessments under AS

06.01.010

. Assessments under AS

06.01.010(d)

are based on the branch bank’s total deposits in the state.

When the department considers it necessary to protect the public interest, the department or a competent person designated by the department may examine an interstate state bank or international bank with a branch in the state. The interstate state bank or international bank shall pay an examination fee established under AS

06.01.010

.

The department may require periodic reports from an interstate state bank or an interstate national bank that maintains a branch in this state and from a bank holding company that controls the interstate state bank or interstate national bank. The reports shall be made under oath and filed as frequently as required by the department. The reports must contain the information and detail that the department determines to be appropriate to assure continuing compliance of the interstate state bank or interstate national bank with the provisions of this title.

The department may enter into cooperative, coordinating, or information-sharing agreements with other depository institution supervisory agencies or with an organization affiliated with or representing depository institution supervisory agencies, to handle the periodic examination or other supervision of a depository institution branch that is located in this state and owned by a depository institution organized in another state, or of a depository institution branch that is located in a host state and owned by a depository institution organized in this state. Under the agreements, the department may accept reports of examination and reports of investigation instead of conducting the department’s own examinations or investigations. The department may enter into joint enforcement action agreements with other depository institution supervisory agencies having concurrent jurisdiction over a depository institution branch that is located in this state and owned by a depository institution organized in another state, or over a depository institution branch that is located in a host state and owned by a depository institution organized in this state. Notwithstanding the existence of an agreement under this subsection, the department may at any time make an examination or take supervisory or enforcement action independently if the department determines that the examination or action is necessary or appropriate to carry out the department’s responsibilities under this title or to ensure compliance with the laws of this state. In this subsection, “host state” means a state, other than the state where the depository institution is organized, in which a depository institution maintains, or seeks to establish and maintain, a branch.

An interstate national bank operating a branch bank in this state is subject to the provisions of AS

06.05.548

and

06.05.550

and the regulations adopted and orders issued under those sections.

History.

(§ 87 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 4 ch 28 SLA 1996; am §§ 36 — 40 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.05.570.
Out-of-state bank holding companies.

An out-of-state bank holding company may acquire and own all or a portion of the voting securities or other capital stock of, or all or substantially all of the assets of, one or more state banks, domestic bank holding companies, or national banks conducting a banking business in the state, unless the state bank or national bank is a recently formed bank. Before an out-of-state bank holding company may acquire a state bank or bank holding company of a state bank doing business in this state, the out-of-state bank holding company shall apply for and obtain a permit from the department. In considering whether to issue a permit, the department shall consider the benefits to the public, the preservation of a competitive banking industry, and the maintenance of a safe and sound bank industry. To assure full protection of the public, the department may require an out-of-state bank holding company that directly or indirectly owns, holds, or controls stock in a state bank or domestic bank holding company to post a bond with the department under conditions established by the department. The amount of the bond may not be more than the product obtained by multiplying the amount of paid-in capital and paid-in surplus of the state bank or domestic bank holding company by the percentage of state bank or domestic bank holding company stock directly or indirectly owned, held, or controlled by the out-of-state bank holding company.

When the department considers it necessary, the department or a competent person designated by the department may examine an out-of-state bank holding company directly or indirectly owning, holding, or controlling state bank stock or domestic bank holding company stock. The out-of-state bank holding company shall pay an examination fee established under AS

06.01.010

.

The provisions of this section do not apply to a company that

acquires or holds voting securities or other capital stock of a bank or bank holding company for only a reasonable period of time in connection with the underwriting of securities;

is an agency of the United States or of a state, or if the majority of the company is owned by the United States or a state;

is an independent federal financial regulatory agency or a trustee or agent of an independent federal financial regulatory agency; or

under a plan of financial restructuring that is intended to prevent the failure of a state bank and that is approved by the department,

acquires or receives 25 percent or more of a class of voting securities or other capital stock of the bank or bank holding company subject to the plan, and owns, controls, or holds, with the power to vote, the securities acquired or received in excess of 24.99 percent of that class for a period of time that permits the distribution or resale of the securities or other capital stock on a reasonable basis; or

purchases or receives securities under the plan and, after the purchase or receipt, owns, controls, or holds, with a power to vote, less than 25 percent of a class of voting securities or other capital stock of the bank or bank holding company subject to the plan, if subsequently, solely through the action or inaction of others, including the bank or bank holding company, owns, controls, or holds, with a power to vote, 25 percent or more of a class of voting securities or other capital stock of the bank or bank holding company; the exemption in this subparagraph does not apply if the department determines, after notice and opportunity for hearing under AS

06.01.030

, that the ownership, control, or holding of the securities or stock exceeding 24.99 percent of a class, other than under a plan to promptly dispose of the securities or stock under the supervision of the department, would permit the organization in any manner to control the election of a majority of the board of directors or trustees, or to directly or indirectly exercise a controlling influence over the management or policies of the bank or bank holding company.

History.

(§ 87 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 41 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to a trust company as a state bank for purposes of this section, see AS

06.05.235(g)

.

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.